Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.290

Applicability of workers' compensation law.

Insofar as not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, the maximum amount payable to a claimant shall be not greater than the amount allowable for similar disability under the workers' compensation act, chapter 51.32 RCW as amended by chapter 289, Laws of 1971 ex.sess., and any amendments thereto. "Employee" as used in said title shall include an emergency worker when liability for the furnishing of compensation and benefits exists pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and as limited by the provisions of this chapter. Where liability for compensation and benefits exists, such compensation and benefits shall be provided in accordance with the applicable provisions of said sections of chapter 51.32 RCW and at the maximum rate provided therein, subject, however, to the limitations set forth in this chapter.

[ 1987 c 185 s 8; 1984 c 38 s 30; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 32; 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 71; 1953 c 223 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.

Severability—Effective dates—1971 ex.s. c 289: See RCW 51.98.060 and 51.98.070.